North Dakota, session 69, SB2141.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 61-04-15.4 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
61-04-15.4. Change in purpose of use.
1. A permitholder may change the purpose of use of a conditional or perfected water permit
without affecting the priority date, if approved by the department of water resources.
Applications for a
2. An application to change in the purpose of use must be processed and evaluated in the same
manner as a conditional water permit application. A
3. The department of water resources may approve the proposed change if the proposed change
will not adversely affect the rights of other appropriators and if a change in the purpose of use
may be authorized only foris:
a. To a superior use as determined byunder the order of priority in section 61-04-06.1. The
department may approve the proposed change if the proposed change will not adversely
affect the rights of other appropriators; or
b. To livestock use or fish, wildlife, and recreation use for a reservoir authorizing no
withdrawal of water.

S. B. NO. 2141 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2141.
Senate Vote: Yeas 41 Nays 6 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 91 Nays 1 Absent 2
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State